District of Columbia statutes.
29-1201.05

Applicability of trust law.

The law of the District pertaining to common-law trusts shall supplement this chapter. However, a governing instrument may supersede or modify application to the statutory trust of any law of the District pertaining to common-law trusts.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 105 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.